pt-BR: Adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas > Acessórios e cuidados para armas > Acessórios e equipamentos de recarga: Prensas para recarga de munição
es: Productos para adultos > Armas y accesorios para armas > Accesorios y cuidado para armas de fuego > Productos y accesorios de recarga: Prensas de recarga de munición
fi: Aikuiset > Aseet ja asetarvikkeet > Aseiden hoito- ja lisätarvikkeet > Jälleenlataustarvikkeet ja -välineet: Jälleenlatauksen ammuspuristimet
en: Mature > Weapons & Weapon Accessories > Weapon Care & Accessories > Reloading Supplies & Equipment: Ammunition Reloading Presses
tr: Yetişkinlere Yönelik Ürünler > Silahlar ve Silah Aksesuarları > Silah Bakımı ve Aksesuarları > Yedek Cephane ve Ekipmanları: Mühimmat Doldurma Presleri
ru: Товары для взрослых > Оружие и аксессуары для него > Товары для ухода за оружием и аксессуары > Оборудование и материалы для снаряжения патронов: Прессы для снаряжения патронов
zh-CN: 成人 > 武器/武器配件 > 武器保养/配件 > 弹药更换用品和器具: 装弹挤压装置
zh-TW: 成人用品 > 武器配件 > 武器保養/配件 > 彈藥重裝/裝備: 裝彈壓床
pt-PT: Para adultos > Armas e acessórios para armas > Manutenção e acessórios de armas > Consumíveis de recarga e equipamento: Prensas de recarga de munições
hr-HR: Za odrasle > Oružje i pribor za oružje > Pribor za održavanje oružja > Oprema za punjenje streljiva: Preše za punjenje streljiva
nb: Voksen > Våpen og våpentilbehør > Våpenpleie og -tilbehør > Materiell og utstyr for lading: Ladepresser for ammunisjon
pl: Dojrzały > Broń i akcesoria do broni > Konserwacja i akcesoria do broni palnej > Ponowne ładowanie materiałów eksploatacyjnych i sprzętu: Prasy do przeładunku amunicji
sk-SK: Dospelý > Zbrane a príslušenstvo k zbraniam > Starostlivosť o zbrane a príslušenstvo > Nabíjací materiál a vybavenie: Lisy na nabíjanie munície
da: Voksne > Våben og våbentilbehør > Våbenpleje og tilbehør > Tilbehør og forsyninger til genladning: Presse til genopfyldning af ammunition
it: Articoli per adulti > Armi e accessori per armi > Accessori e pulizia armi > Attrezzature e accessori per ricarica: Presse per ricarica di munizioni
fr: Mature > Armes et accessoires d’armes > Entretien des armes et accessoires > Fournitures et équipements de rechargement: Presses de rechargement de munitions
sl-SI: Odrasla vsebina > Orožje in dodatki za orožje > Nega in dodatki za orožje > Pripomočki in oprema za polnjenje streliva: Stiskalnice za ponovno polnjenje streliva
sv: Avsett för vuxna > Vapen och vapentillbehör > Vapenvård och tillbehör > Tillbehör och utrustning för omladdning: Laddningspressar för ammunition
cs: Pro dospělé > Zbraně a příslušenství ke zbraním > Péče o zbraně a příslušenství > Přebíjecí materiál a vybavení: Přebíjecí lisy
ja: 成人向け > 武器&武器関連用品 > 武器手入れ&関連用品 > リロード用品&器具: 弾薬リローディングプレス
lt-LT: Prekės suaugusiesiems > Ginklai ir ginklų priedai > Ginklų priežiūra ir priedai > Šaudmenų užtaisymo reikmenys ir įranga: Šaudmenų užtaisymo presai
el: Είδη ενηλίκων > Όπλα & αξεσουάρ Όπλων > Φροντίδα & αξεσουάρ όπλων > Υλικά & εξοπλισμός επαναγέμισης: Πρέσες επαναγέμισης πυρομαχικών
nl: Volwassenen > Wapens en wapenaccessoires > Accessoires en onderhoud voor vuurwapens > Herlaadmateriaal en -apparatuur: Herlaadpersen voor munitie
hu: Érett > Fegyverek és fegyverkiegészítők > Fegyverápolás és -kiegészítők > Újratöltési kellékek és felszerelések: Lőszerújratöltő prések
ko: 성인용 제품 > 무기/무기 부대용품 > 무기 관리용품/부대용품 > 재장전 용품/장비: 탄약 리로딩 프레스
th: สำหรับผู้ใหญ่ > อาวุธและอุปกรณ์เสริมอาวุธ > อุปกรณ์ดูแลและตกแต่งอาวุธ > อุปกรณ์และเครื่องมือบรรจุกระสุน: เครื่องอัดกระสุนแบบแท่น
ro-RO: Adulți > Arme și accesorii pentru arme > Îngrijirea armelor și accesorii > Consumabile și echipamente pentru reîncărcare: Prese pentru reîncărcarea cu muniție
vi: Trưởng thành > Vũ khí và Phụ kiện vũ khí > Bảo quản vũ khí & phụ kiện > Nạp lại Vật tư & Thiết bị: Máy ép nạp đạn
bg-BG: За възрастни > Оръжия и аксесоари за оръжие > Грижа за оръжие и аксесоари > Консумативи и оборудване за презареждане: Преси за презареждане на боеприпаси
de: Reif > Waffen und Waffenzubehör > Waffenpflege und Zubehör > Material & Ausrüstung zum Nachladen von Munition: Munitions-Ladepressen